Illinois, session 104th, HB1922.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5changing Section 5-5.2 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/5-5.2)7    Sec. 5-5.2. Payment. 8    (a) All nursing facilities that are grouped pursuant to 9Section 5-5.1 of this Act shall receive the same rate of 10payment for similar services.11    (b) It shall be a matter of State policy that the Illinois 12Department shall utilize a uniform billing cycle throughout 13the State for the long-term care providers.14    (c) (Blank). 15    (c-1) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Code, 16the methodologies for reimbursement of nursing services as 17provided under this Article shall no longer be applicable for 18bills payable for nursing services rendered on or after a new 19reimbursement system based on the Patient Driven Payment Model 20(PDPM) has been fully operationalized, which shall take effect 21for services provided on or after the implementation of the 22PDPM reimbursement system begins. For the purposes of Public 23Act 102-1035, the implementation date of the PDPM   HB1922- 2 -LRB104 09529 KTG 19592 b1reimbursement system and all related provisions shall be July 21, 2022 if the following conditions are met: (i) the Centers 3for Medicare and Medicaid Services has approved corresponding 4changes in the reimbursement system and bed assessment; and 5(ii) the Department has filed rules to implement these changes 6no later than June 1, 2022. Failure of the Department to file 7rules to implement the changes provided in Public Act 102-1035 8no later than June 1, 2022 shall result in the implementation 9date being delayed to October 1, 2022. 10    (d) The new nursing services reimbursement methodology 11utilizing the Patient Driven Payment Model, which shall be 12referred to as the PDPM reimbursement system, taking effect 13July 1, 2022, upon federal approval by the Centers for 14Medicare and Medicaid Services, shall be based on the 15following: 16        (1) The methodology shall be resident-centered, 17    facility-specific, cost-based, and based on guidance from 18    the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. 19        (2) Costs shall be annually rebased and case mix index 20    quarterly updated. The nursing services methodology will 21    be assigned to the Medicaid enrolled residents on record 22    as of 30 days prior to the beginning of the rate period in 23    the Department's Medicaid Management Information System 24    (MMIS) as present on the last day of the second quarter 25    preceding the rate period based upon the Assessment 26    Reference Date of the Minimum Data Set (MDS).   HB1922- 3 -LRB104 09529 KTG 19592 b1        (3) Regional wage adjustors based on the Health 2    Service Areas (HSA) groupings and adjusters in effect on 3    April 30, 2012 shall be included, except no adjuster shall 4    be lower than 1.06. 5        (4) PDPM nursing case mix indices in effect on March 6    1, 2022 shall be assigned to each resident class at no less 7    than 0.7858 of the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid 8    Services PDPM unadjusted case mix values, in effect on 9    March 1, 2022.10        (5) The pool of funds available for distribution by 11    case mix and the base facility rate shall be determined 12    using the formula contained in subsection (d-1). 13        (6) The Department shall establish a variable per diem 14    staffing add-on in accordance with the most recent 15    available federal staffing report, currently the Payroll 16    Based Journal, for the same period of time, and if 17    applicable adjusted for acuity using the same quarter's 18    MDS. The Department shall rely on Payroll Based Journals 19    provided to the Department of Public Health to make a 20    determination of non-submission. If the Department is 21    notified by a facility of missing or inaccurate Payroll 22    Based Journal data or an incorrect calculation of 23    staffing, the Department must make a correction as soon as 24    the error is verified for the applicable quarter.25        Beginning October 1, 2024, the staffing percentage 26    used in the calculation of the per diem staffing add-on   HB1922- 4 -LRB104 09529 KTG 19592 b1    shall be its PDPM STRIVE Staffing Ratio which equals: its 2    Reported Total Nurse Staffing Hours Per Resident Per Day 3    as published in the most recent federal staffing report 4    (the Provider Information File), divided by the facility's 5    PDPM STRIVE Staffing Target. Each facility's PDPM STRIVE 6    Staffing Target is equal to .82 times the facility's 7    Illinois Adjusted Facility Case-Mix Hours Per Resident Per 8    Day. A facility's Illinois Adjusted Facility Case Mix 9    Hours Per Resident Per Day is equal to its Case-Mix Total 10    Nurse Staffing Hours Per Resident Per Day (as published in 11    the most recent federal staffing report) times 3.662 12    (which reflects the national resident days-weighted mean 13    Reported Total Nurse Staffing Hours Per Resident Per Day 14    as calculated using the January 2024 federal Provider 15    Information Files), divided by the national resident 16    days-weighted mean Reported Total Nurse Staffing Hours Per 17    Resident Per Day calculated using the most recent federal 18    Provider Information File.19        (6.5) Beginning July 1, 2024, the paid per diem 20    staffing add-on shall be the paid per diem staffing add-on 21    in effect April 1, 2024. For dates beginning October 1, 22    2024 and through September 30, 2025, the denominator for 23    the staffing percentage shall be the lesser of the 24    facility's PDPM STRIVE Staffing Target and:25            (A) For the quarter beginning October 1, 2024, the 26        sum of 20% of the facility's PDPM STRIVE Staffing   HB1922- 5 -LRB104 09529 KTG 19592 b1        Target and 80% of the facility's Case-Mix Total Nurse 2        Staffing Hours Per Resident Per Day (as published in 3        the January 2024 federal staffing report).4            (B) For the quarter beginning January 1, 2025, the 5        sum of 40% of the facility's PDPM STRIVE Staffing 6        Target and 60% of the facility's Case-Mix Total Nurse 7        Staffing Hours Per Resident Per Day (as published in 8        the January 2024 federal staffing report).9            (C) For the quarter beginning March 1, 2025, the 10        sum of 60% of the facility's PDPM STRIVE Staffing 11        Target and 40% of the facility's Case-Mix Total Nurse 12        Staffing Hours Per Resident Per Day (as published in 13        the January 2024 federal staffing report).14            (D) For the quarter beginning July 1, 2025, the 15        sum of 80% of the facility's PDPM STRIVE Staffing 16        Target and 20% of the facility's Case-Mix Total Nurse 17        Staffing Hours Per Resident Per Day (as published in 18        the January 2024 federal staffing report). 19         Facilities with at least 70% of the staffing 20    indicated by the STRIVE study shall be paid a per diem 21    add-on of $9, increasing by equivalent steps for each 22    whole percentage point until the facilities reach a per 23    diem of $16.52. Facilities with at least 80% of the 24    staffing indicated by the STRIVE study shall be paid a per 25    diem add-on of $16.52, increasing by equivalent steps for 26    each whole percentage point until the facilities reach a   HB1922- 6 -LRB104 09529 KTG 19592 b1    per diem add-on of $25.77. Facilities with at least 92% of 2    the staffing indicated by the STRIVE study shall be paid a 3    per diem add-on of $25.77, increasing by equivalent steps 4    for each whole percentage point until the facilities reach 5    a per diem add-on of $30.98. Facilities with at least 100% 6    of the staffing indicated by the STRIVE study shall be 7    paid a per diem add-on of $30.98, increasing by equivalent 8    steps for each whole percentage point until the facilities 9    reach a per diem add-on of $36.44. Facilities with at 10    least 110% of the staffing indicated by the STRIVE study 11    shall be paid a per diem add-on of $36.44, increasing by 12    equivalent steps for each whole percentage point until the 13    facilities reach a per diem add-on of $38.68. Facilities 14    with at least 125% or higher of the staffing indicated by 15    the STRIVE study shall be paid a per diem add-on of $38.68. 16    No nursing facility's variable staffing per diem add-on 17    shall be reduced by more than 5% in 2 consecutive 18    quarters. For the quarters beginning July 1, 2022 and 19    October 1, 2022, no facility's variable per diem staffing 20    add-on shall be calculated at a rate lower than 85% of the 21    staffing indicated by the STRIVE study. No facility below 22    70% of the staffing indicated by the STRIVE study shall 23    receive a variable per diem staffing add-on after December 24    31, 2022. 25        (7) For dates of services beginning July 1, 2022, the 26    PDPM nursing component per diem for each nursing facility   HB1922- 7 -LRB104 09529 KTG 19592 b1    shall be the product of the facility's (i) statewide PDPM 2    nursing base per diem rate, $92.25, adjusted for the 3    facility average PDPM case mix index calculated quarterly 4    and (ii) the regional wage adjuster, and then add the 5    Medicaid access adjustment as defined in (e-3) of this 6    Section. Transition rates for services provided between 7    July 1, 2022 and October 1, 2023 shall be the greater of 8    the PDPM nursing component per diem or: 9            (A) for the quarter beginning July 1, 2022, the 10        RUG-IV nursing component per diem;11            (B) for the quarter beginning October 1, 2022, the 12        sum of the RUG-IV nursing component per diem 13        multiplied by 0.80 and the PDPM nursing component per 14        diem multiplied by 0.20;15            (C) for the quarter beginning January 1, 2023, the 16        sum of the RUG-IV nursing component per diem 17        multiplied by 0.60 and the PDPM nursing component per 18        diem multiplied by 0.40;19            (D) for the quarter beginning April 1, 2023, the 20        sum of the RUG-IV nursing component per diem 21        multiplied by 0.40 and the PDPM nursing component per 22        diem multiplied by 0.60;23            (E) for the quarter beginning July 1, 2023, the 24        sum of the RUG-IV nursing component per diem 25        multiplied by 0.20 and the PDPM nursing component per 26        diem multiplied by 0.80; or  HB1922- 8 -LRB104 09529 KTG 19592 b1            (F) for the quarter beginning October 1, 2023 and 2        each subsequent quarter, the transition rate shall end 3        and a nursing facility shall be paid 100% of the PDPM 4        nursing component per diem.5    (d-1) Calculation of base year Statewide RUG-IV nursing 6base per diem rate. 7        (1) Base rate spending pool shall be: 8            (A) The base year resident days which are 9        calculated by multiplying the number of Medicaid 10        residents in each nursing home as indicated in the MDS 11        data defined in paragraph (4) by 365.12            (B) Each facility's nursing component per diem in 13        effect on July 1, 2012 shall be multiplied by 14        subsection (A).15            (C) Thirteen million is added to the product of 16        subparagraph (A) and subparagraph (B) to adjust for 17        the exclusion of nursing homes defined in paragraph 18        (5). 19        (2) For each nursing home with Medicaid residents as 20    indicated by the MDS data defined in paragraph (4), 21    weighted days adjusted for case mix and regional wage 22    adjustment shall be calculated. For each home this 23    calculation is the product of:24            (A) Base year resident days as calculated in 25        subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1).26            (B) The nursing home's regional wage adjustor   HB1922- 9 -LRB104 09529 KTG 19592 b1        based on the Health Service Areas (HSA) groupings and 2        adjustors in effect on April 30, 2012.3            (C) Facility weighted case mix which is the number 4        of Medicaid residents as indicated by the MDS data 5        defined in paragraph (4) multiplied by the associated 6        case weight for the RUG-IV 48 grouper model using 7        standard RUG-IV procedures for index maximization.8            (D) The sum of the products calculated for each 9        nursing home in subparagraphs (A) through (C) above 10        shall be the base year case mix, rate adjusted 11        weighted days.12        (3) The Statewide RUG-IV nursing base per diem rate:13            (A) on January 1, 2014 shall be the quotient of the 14        paragraph (1) divided by the sum calculated under 15        subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2);16            (B) on and after July 1, 2014 and until July 1, 17        2022, shall be the amount calculated under 18        subparagraph (A) of this paragraph (3) plus $1.76; and 19            (C) beginning July 1, 2022 and thereafter, $7 20        shall be added to the amount calculated under 21        subparagraph (B) of this paragraph (3) of this 22        Section. 23        (4) Minimum Data Set (MDS) comprehensive assessments 24    for Medicaid residents on the last day of the quarter used 25    to establish the base rate.26        (5) Nursing facilities designated as of July 1, 2012   HB1922- 10 -LRB104 09529 KTG 19592 b1    by the Department as "Institutions for Mental Disease" 2    shall be excluded from all calculations under this 3    subsection. The data from these facilities shall not be 4    used in the computations described in paragraphs (1) 5    through (4) above to establish the base rate. 6    (e) Beginning July 1, 2014, the Department shall allocate 7funding in the amount up to $10,000,000 for per diem add-ons to 8the RUGS methodology for dates of service on and after July 1, 92014:10        (1) $0.63 for each resident who scores in I4200 11    Alzheimer's Disease or I4800 non-Alzheimer's Dementia.12        (2) $2.67 for each resident who scores either a "1" or 13    "2" in any items S1200A through S1200I and also scores in 14    RUG groups PA1, PA2, BA1, or BA2.15    (e-1) (Blank).16    (e-2) For dates of services beginning January 1, 2014 and 17ending September 30, 2023, the RUG-IV nursing component per 18diem for a nursing home shall be the product of the statewide 19RUG-IV nursing base per diem rate, the facility average case 20mix index, and the regional wage adjustor. For dates of 21service beginning July 1, 2022 and ending September 30, 2023, 22the Medicaid access adjustment described in subsection (e-3) 23shall be added to the product. 24    (e-3) A Medicaid Access Adjustment of $4 adjusted for the 25facility average PDPM case mix index calculated quarterly 26shall be added to the statewide PDPM nursing per diem for all   HB1922- 11 -LRB104 09529 KTG 19592 b1facilities with annual Medicaid bed days of at least 70% of all 2occupied bed days adjusted quarterly. For each new calendar 3year and for the 6-month period beginning July 1, 2022, the 4percentage of a facility's occupied bed days comprised of 5Medicaid bed days shall be determined by the Department 6quarterly. For dates of service beginning January 1, 2023, the 7Medicaid Access Adjustment shall be increased to $4.75. This 8subsection shall be inoperative on and after January 1, 2028. 9    (e-4) Subject to federal approval, on and after January 1, 102024, the Department shall increase the rate add-on at 11paragraph (7) subsection (a) under 89 Ill. Adm. Code 147.335 12for ventilator services from $208 per day to $481 per day. 13Payment is subject to the criteria and requirements under 89 14Ill. Adm. Code 147.335. 15    (f) (Blank).16    (g) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, on 17and after July 1, 2012, for facilities not designated by the 18Department of Healthcare and Family Services as "Institutions 19for Mental Disease", rates effective May 1, 2011 shall be 20adjusted as follows:21        (1) (Blank);22        (2) (Blank);23        (3) Facility rates for the capital and support 24    components shall be reduced by 1.7%.25    (h) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, on 26and after July 1, 2012, nursing facilities designated by the   HB1922- 12 -LRB104 09529 KTG 19592 b1Department of Healthcare and Family Services as "Institutions 2for Mental Disease" and "Institutions for Mental Disease" that 3are facilities licensed under the Specialized Mental Health 4Rehabilitation Act of 2013 shall have the nursing, 5socio-developmental, capital, and support components of their 6reimbursement rate effective May 1, 2011 reduced in total by 72.7%.8    (i) On and after July 1, 2014, the reimbursement rates for 9the support component of the nursing facility rate for 10facilities licensed under the Nursing Home Care Act as skilled 11or intermediate care facilities shall be the rate in effect on 12June 30, 2014 increased by 8.17%. 13    (i-1) Subject to federal approval, on and after January 1, 142024, the reimbursement rates for the support component of the 15nursing facility rate for facilities licensed under the 16Nursing Home Care Act as skilled or intermediate care 17facilities shall be the rate in effect on June 30, 2023 18increased by 12%. 19    (j) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, subject to 20federal approval, effective July 1, 2019, sufficient funds 21shall be allocated for changes to rates for facilities 22licensed under the Nursing Home Care Act as skilled nursing 23facilities or intermediate care facilities for dates of 24services on and after July 1, 2019: (i) to establish, through 25June 30, 2022 a per diem add-on to the direct care per diem 26rate not to exceed $70,000,000 annually in the aggregate   HB1922- 13 -LRB104 09529 KTG 19592 b1taking into account federal matching funds for the purpose of 2addressing the facility's unique staffing needs, adjusted 3quarterly and distributed by a weighted formula based on 4Medicaid bed days on the last day of the second quarter 5preceding the quarter for which the rate is being adjusted. 6Beginning July 1, 2022, the annual $70,000,000 described in 7the preceding sentence shall be dedicated to the variable per 8diem add-on for staffing under paragraph (6) of subsection 9(d); and (ii) in an amount not to exceed $170,000,000 annually 10in the aggregate taking into account federal matching funds to 11permit the support component of the nursing facility rate to 12be updated as follows:13        (1) 80%, or $136,000,000, of the funds shall be used 14    to update each facility's rate in effect on June 30, 2019 15    using the most recent cost reports on file, which have had 16    a limited review conducted by the Department of Healthcare 17    and Family Services and will not hold up enacting the rate 18    increase, with the Department of Healthcare and Family 19    Services. 20        (2) After completing the calculation in paragraph (1), 21    any facility whose rate is less than the rate in effect on 22    June 30, 2019 shall have its rate restored to the rate in 23    effect on June 30, 2019 from the 20% of the funds set 24    aside. 25        (3) The remainder of the 20%, or $34,000,000, shall be 26    used to increase each facility's rate by an equal   HB1922- 14 -LRB104 09529 KTG 19592 b1    percentage. 2    (k) During the first quarter of State Fiscal Year 2020, 3the Department of Healthcare of Family Services must convene a 4technical advisory group consisting of members of all trade 5associations representing Illinois skilled nursing providers 6to discuss changes necessary with federal implementation of 7Medicare's Patient-Driven Payment Model. Implementation of 8Medicare's Patient-Driven Payment Model shall, by September 1, 92020, end the collection of the MDS data that is necessary to 10maintain the current RUG-IV Medicaid payment methodology. The 11technical advisory group must consider a revised reimbursement 12methodology that takes into account transparency, 13accountability, actual staffing as reported under the 14federally required Payroll Based Journal system, changes to 15the minimum wage, adequacy in coverage of the cost of care, and 16a quality component that rewards quality improvements.17    (l) The Department shall establish per diem add-on 18payments to improve the quality of care delivered by 19facilities, including:20        (1) Incentive payments determined by facility 21    performance on specified quality measures in an initial 22    amount of $70,000,000. Nothing in this subsection shall be 23    construed to limit the quality of care payments in the 24    aggregate statewide to $70,000,000, and, if quality of 25    care has improved across nursing facilities, the 26    Department shall adjust those add-on payments accordingly.   HB1922- 15 -LRB104 09529 KTG 19592 b1    The quality payment methodology described in this 2    subsection must be used for at least State Fiscal Year 3    2023. Beginning with the quarter starting July 1, 2023, 4    the Department may add, remove, or change quality metrics 5    and make associated changes to the quality payment 6    methodology as outlined in subparagraph (E). Facilities 7    designated by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid 8    Services as a special focus facility or a hospital-based 9    nursing home do not qualify for quality payments.10            (A) Each quality pool must be distributed by 11        assigning a quality weighted score for each nursing 12        home which is calculated by multiplying the nursing 13        home's quality base period Medicaid days by the 14        nursing home's star rating weight in that period.15            (B) Star rating weights are assigned based on the 16        nursing home's star rating for the LTS quality star 17        rating. As used in this subparagraph, "LTS quality 18        star rating" means the long-term stay quality rating 19        for each nursing facility, as assigned by the Centers 20        for Medicare and Medicaid Services under the Five-Star 21        Quality Rating System. The rating is a number ranging 22        from 0 (lowest) to 5 (highest).23                (i) Zero-star or one-star rating has a weight 24            of 0.25                (ii) Two-star rating has a weight of 0.75.26                (iii) Three-star rating has a weight of 1.5.   HB1922- 16 -LRB104 09529 KTG 19592 b1                (iv) Four-star rating has a weight of 2.5.2                (v) Five-star rating has a weight of 3.5.3            (C) Each nursing home's quality weight score is 4        divided by the sum of all quality weight scores for 5        qualifying nursing homes to determine the proportion 6        of the quality pool to be paid to the nursing home. 7            (D) The quality pool is no less than $70,000,000 8        annually or $17,500,000 per quarter. The Department 9        shall publish on its website the estimated payments 10        and the associated weights for each facility 45 days 11        prior to when the initial payments for the quarter are 12        to be paid. The Department shall assign each facility 13        the most recent and applicable quarter's STAR value 14        unless the facility notifies the Department within 15 15        days of an issue and the facility provides reasonable 16        evidence demonstrating its timely compliance with 17        federal data submission requirements for the quarter 18        of record. If such evidence cannot be provided to the 19        Department, the STAR rating assigned to the facility 20        shall be reduced by one from the prior quarter. 21            (E) The Department shall review quality metrics 22        used for payment of the quality pool and make 23        recommendations for any associated changes to the 24        methodology for distributing quality pool payments in 25        consultation with associations representing long-term 26        care providers, consumer advocates, organizations   HB1922- 17 -LRB104 09529 KTG 19592 b1        representing workers of long-term care facilities, and 2        payors. The Department may establish, by rule, changes 3        to the methodology for distributing quality pool 4        payments. 5            (F) The Department shall disburse quality pool 6        payments from the Long-Term Care Provider Fund on a 7        monthly basis in amounts proportional to the total 8        quality pool payment determined for the quarter. 9            (G) The Department shall publish any changes in 10        the methodology for distributing quality pool payments 11        prior to the beginning of the measurement period or 12        quality base period for any metric added to the 13        distribution's methodology. 14        (2) Payments based on CNA tenure, promotion, and CNA 15    training for the purpose of increasing CNA compensation. 16    It is the intent of this subsection that payments made in 17    accordance with this paragraph be directly incorporated 18    into increased compensation for CNAs. As used in this 19    paragraph, "CNA" means a certified nursing assistant as 20    that term is described in Section 3-206 of the Nursing 21    Home Care Act, Section 3-206 of the ID/DD Community Care 22    Act, and Section 3-206 of the MC/DD Act. Based on the 23    schedule in this paragraph, the Department shall pay to 24    each facility Medicaid's share of the facility's estimated 25    CNA hours performed by employees and agency workers, 26    estimated overtime hours, and benefits and taxes paid to   HB1922- 18 -LRB104 09529 KTG 19592 b1    and on behalf of CNA workers at the beginning of each 2    quarter. The Department shall establish, by rule, payments 3    to nursing facilities equal to Medicaid's share of the 4    tenure wage increments specified in this paragraph for all 5    reported CNA employee hours compensated according to a 6    posted schedule consisting of increments at least as large 7    as those specified in this paragraph. The increments are 8    as follows: an additional $1.50 per hour for CNAs with at 9    least one and less than 2 years' experience plus another 10    $1 per hour for each additional year of experience up to a 11    maximum of $6.50 for CNAs with at least 6 years of 12    experience. For purposes of this paragraph, Medicaid's 13    share shall be the ratio determined by paid Medicaid bed 14    days divided by total bed days for the applicable time 15    period used in the calculation. Moneys paid by the 16    Department to each facility and moneys paid by each 17    facility to workers and agencies or on behalf of workers 18    and agencies shall be reconciled at the end of each 19    quarter.20        Calculation of tenure compensation shall include the 21    following:22            (A) compensation for regular CNA hours: an 23        additional $1.50 per hour for CNAs with at least one 24        and less than 2 years' experience plus another $1 per 25        hour for each additional year of experience up to a 26        maximum of $6.50 for CNAs with at least 6 years of   HB1922- 19 -LRB104 09529 KTG 19592 b1        experience;2            (B) overtime calculated at time and a half; and3            (C) benefits and taxes at 25%. 4        In addition, and additive to any tenure increments 5    paid as specified in this paragraph, the Department shall 6    establish, by rule, payments supporting Medicaid's share 7    of the promotion-based wage increments for CNA employee 8    hours compensated for that promotion with at least a $1.50 9    hourly increase. Medicaid's share shall be established as 10    it is for the tenure increments described in this 11    paragraph. Estimates of overtime shall be calculated at 12    time and a half and benefits and taxes at 25%. The 13    Department shall pay the facility for qualifying 14    promotions estimated at the beginning of each quarter and 15    reconciled at the end of the quarter. Qualifying 16    promotions shall be defined by the Department in rules for 17    an expected 10-15% subset of CNAs assigned intermediate, 18    specialized, or added roles such as CNA trainers, CNA 19    scheduling "captains", and CNA specialists for resident 20    conditions like dementia or memory care or behavioral 21    health.22    (m) The Department shall work with nursing facility 23industry representatives to design policies and procedures to 24permit facilities to address the integrity of data from 25federal reporting sites used by the Department in setting 26facility rates.   HB1922- 20 -LRB104 09529 KTG 19592 b1(Source: P.A. 102-77, eff. 7-9-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 2102-1035, eff. 5-31-22; 102-1118, eff. 1-18-23; 103-102, 3Article 40, Section 40-5, eff. 1-1-24; 103-102, Article 50, 4Section 50-5, eff. 1-1-24; 103-593, eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 57-1-24.) 6    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 7becoming law.